apertium-sux.sux.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Sumerian

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
## Example inflection pattern:
# NounRoot RegNounInfl
Number
Punctuation
WholeWords


## Example inflection lexicon:
# LEXICON RegNounInfl
# <n><sg>:
# <n><pl>:>s


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

## Example stem lexicon:
# LEXICON NounRoot
# house:house   # A noun
